Utah statutes.
9-1-803.   Creation -- Members -- Appointment -- Terms -- Vacancies -- Per
diem and expenses.
(1)  There is created the Utah Commission on Volunteers consisting of the
following 25 members:
(a)  the lieutenant governor;
(b)  the commissioner of higher education or the commissioner's designee;
(c)  the superintendent of public instruction or the superintendent's
designee;
(d)  nine members appointed by the governor as follows:
(i)  an individual with expertise in the educational, training, and
developmental needs of youth, particularly disadvantaged youth;
(ii)  an individual with experience in promoting the involvement of older
adults in service and volunteerism;
(iii)  a representative of community-based agencies or community-based
organizations within the state;
(iv)  a representative of local governments in the state;
(v)  a representative of local labor organizations in the state;
(vi)  a representative of business;
(vii)  an individual between the ages of 16 and 25 who is a participant or
supervisor in a volunteer or service program;
(viii)  a representative of a National Service Program; and
(ix)  a representative of the corporation as a nonvoting, ex officio member;
and
(e)  13 members appointed by the governor from the following groups:
(i)  local educators;
(ii)  experts in the delivery of human, educational, cultural, environmental,
or public safety services to communities and individuals;
(iii)  representatives of Native American tribes;
(iv)  out-of-school youth or other at-risk youth; and
(v)  representatives of entities that receive assistance under the Domestic
Volunteer Service Act of 1973, 42 U.S.C. 4950 et seq.
(2) (a)  In appointing persons to serve on the commission, the governor shall
ensure that:
(i)  no more than 13 members of the commission are members of the same
political party; and
(ii)  no more than six members of the commission are state government
employees.
(b)  In appointing persons to serve on the commission, the governor shall
strive for balance on the commission according to race, ethnicity, age,
gender, and disability characteristics.
(3) (a)  Except as required by Subsection (3)(b), as terms of current
commission members expire, the governor shall appoint each new member or
reappointed member to a three-year term.
(b)  Notwithstanding the requirements of Subsection (3)(a), the governor
shall, at the time of appointment or reappointment, adjust the length of terms
to ensure that the terms of commission members are staggered so that
approximately one-third of the commission is appointed every year.
(4)  When a vacancy occurs in the membership for any reason, the replacement
shall be appointed for the unexpired term.
(5)  A member appointed by the governor may not serve more than two
consecutive terms.
(6)  A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's
service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:
(a)  Section 63A-3-106;
(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and
(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and
63A-3-107.
(7) (a)  The lieutenant governor is the chair of the commission.
(b)  The commission shall select a vice chair from among its members.
